Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5146YC (2) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 6A.22, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of 3 law, a person shall not exercise the power of eminent domain to 4 acquire right-of-way for, construct, or operate a pipeline for 5 the primary purpose of transporting carbon oxide. 6 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 7 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 8 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to condemnation 9 proceedings for which the application filed under section 6B.3 10 is filed on or after the effective date of this Act. 11